District of Columbia statutes.
21-109

Spouse as guardian of estate.

When an infant to whom a guardian of his or her estate has been appointed marries, he or she may select his or her spouse as the guardian of his or her estate, with the approval of the court; and after he is duly appointed and qualified by giving bond, as is required in other cases, the powers of the guardian previously appointed shall cease, and he shall settle his final account and turn over his ward’s estate to his or her spouse, according to the order and directions of the court.

Sept. 14, 1965, 79 Stat. 739, Pub. L. 89-183, § 1
Oct. 1, 1976, D.C. Law 1-87, § 29(a), 23 DCR 2544

History

1981 Ed., § 21-109.
1973 Ed., § 21-109.

Prior Codifications